Hawaii statutes.
§431:11-111 Sanctions. (a) Any
insurer failing, without just cause, to file any registration statement as
required in this article shall be required, after notice and hearing, to pay a
fine in an amount of not less than $100 and not more than $500 for each day's
delay, to be recovered by the commissioner, and the penalty so recovered shall
be paid into the compliance resolution
fund. The commissioner may reduce the penalty if the insurer demonstrates to
the commissioner that the imposition of the penalty would constitute a
financial hardship to the insurer.

(b) Every director or officer of an insurance
holding company system who knowingly violates, participates in, or assents to,
or who knowingly permits any of the officers or agents of the insurer to engage
in any transactions or make investments that have not been properly reported or
submitted pursuant to section 431:11-105(a), 431:11-106(a)(2), or
431:11-106(b), or that violates this article, shall pay, in their individual
capacity, a civil forfeiture of not less than $100 and not more than $10,000
per violation, after notice and hearing before the commissioner. In
determining the amount of the civil forfeiture, the commissioner shall take
into account the appropriateness of the civil forfeiture with respect to the
gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations, and other matters
as justice may require.

(c) Whenever it appears to the commissioner
that any insurer subject to this article or any director, officer, employee, or
agent thereof has engaged in any transaction or entered into a contract that is
subject to section 431:11-106 and that would not have been approved had the
approval been requested, the commissioner may order the insurer to cease and
desist immediately any further activity under that transaction or contract.
After notice and hearing, the commissioner may also order the insurer to void
any of the contracts and restore the status quo if that action is in the best
interest of the policyholders, creditors, or the public.

(d) Whenever it appears to the commissioner
that any insurer or any director, officer, employee, or agent thereof has
committed a wilful violation of this article, the commissioner may cause
criminal proceedings to be instituted against the insurer or the responsible
director, officer, employee, or agent thereof. Any insurer that wilfully
violates this article may be fined not less than $100 and not more than $10,000
per violation. Any individual who wilfully violates this article may be fined
in the person's individual capacity not less than $100 and not more than
$10,000 per violation or be imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

(e) Any officer, director, or employee of an
insurance holding company system who wilfully and knowingly subscribes to or
makes, or causes to be made, any false statements, false reports, or false
filings with the intent to deceive the commissioner in the performance of the
commissioner's duties under this article, upon conviction thereof, shall be
imprisoned for not more than one year or fined $5,000, or both. Any fines
imposed shall be paid by the officer, director, or employee in the person's
individual capacity.

(f) Whenever it appears to the commissioner
that any person has committed a violation of section 431:11-104 and that
prevents the full understanding of the enterprise risk to the insurer by
affiliates or by the insurance holding company system, the violation may serve
as an independent basis for disapproving dividends or distributions and for
placing the insurer under an order of supervision in accordance with part 2 of
article 15. [L 1987, c 349, pt of §8; am L 1999, c 163, §15(1); am L 2000, c
182, §13; am L 2002, c 39, §14; am L 2014, c 234, §14]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next